Kentucky, session 2025RS, SB246.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS 344.030 TO 344.110 IS CREATED
TO READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) An employer that requires an employee, as a condition of employment, to be
immunized against disease shall:
(a) Grant an exception to any employee for a sincerely held religious belief
against immunization;
(b) Grant an exception to any employee for whom, in the written opinion of a
health care provider, the required immunization would be injurious to his
or her health; and
(c) Provide notice of the required immunization to each employee in a written
document that:
1. Advises in plain language the available exemptions from the required
immunization for a sincerely held religious belief or medical
contraindication; and
2. Requires each employee to acknowledge, in writing, receipt of the
requirement and receipt of the available exemptions.
(2) An employer may require an employee to swear or affirm the claimed exemption
on a form that substantially complies with the following:
"I, [employee name], swear or affirm, by my signature below, that I:
..........Hold a sincere religious belief against receiving immunization
against disease.
.........Object to the immunization as the required immunization would
be injurious to my health.
[Employee signature] ......................................... [Date]............................".
(3) Additional substantiation or documentation of an employee's sincerely held
Page 1 of 5
XXXX 2/17/2025 7:58 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1889
religious belief shall not be required.
(4) A written opinion from a health care provider that the required immunization
would be injurious to the employee's health shall be the only documentation
required for an employee's claimed health exemption. As used in this subsection,
"health care provider" means:
(a) An advanced practice registered nurse licensed under KRS Chapter 314;
(b) A pharmacist licensed under KRS Chapter 315;
(c) A physician or osteopath licensed under KRS Chapter 311; or
(d) A physician assistant licensed under KRS 311.840 to 311.862.
(5) (a) Any person injured by any act in violation of this section shall have a civil
cause of action in Circuit Court to:
1. Enjoin further violations;
2. Recover the actual damages sustained, including reasonable
attorney's fees, together with the costs of the action; and
3. Recover punitive damages.
(b) Notwithstanding the provisions of KRS 342.690, an employee who suffers
an adverse reaction to an immunization required as a condition of his or
her employment may claim compensation under KRS Chapter 342 and may
maintain a civil cause of action as provided under paragraph (a) of this
section, provided:
1. The amount of compensation paid under KRS Chapter 342 shall be
credited against the amount received in the civil action; and
2. If the amount of compensation paid under KRS Chapter 342 is larger
than the amount received in the civil action, the amount of damages
less the employee's legal fees, costs, and expenses in the civil action
shall be credited against the amount of compensation.
Section 2. KRS 344.040 is amended to read as follows:
Page 2 of 5
XXXX 2/17/2025 7:58 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1889
(1) It is an unlawful practice for an employer:
(a) To fail or refuse to hire, or to discharge any individual, or otherwise to
discriminate against an individual with respect to compensation, terms,
conditions, or privileges of employment, because of the individual's race,
color, religion, national origin, sex, age forty (40) and over, because the
person is a qualified individual with a disability, or because the individual is a
smoker or nonsmoker, as long as the person complies with any workplace
policy concerning smoking;
(b) To limit, segregate, or classify employees in any way which would deprive or
tend to deprive an individual of employment opportunities or otherwise
adversely affect status as an employee, because of the individual's race, color,
religion, national origin, sex, or age forty (40) and over, because the person is
a qualified individual with a disability, or because the individual is a smoker
or nonsmoker, as long as the person complies with any workplace policy
concerning smoking;
(c) To fail to make reasonable accommodations for any employee with
limitations related to pregnancy, childbirth, or a related medical condition
who requests an accommodation, including but not limited to the need to
express breast milk, unless the employer can demonstrate the accommodation
would impose an undue hardship on the employer's program, enterprise, or
business. The following shall be required as to reasonable accommodations:
1. An employee shall not be required to take leave from work if another
reasonable accommodation can be provided;
2. The employer and employee shall engage in a timely, good faith, and
interactive process to determine effective reasonable accommodations;
and
3. If the employer has a policy to provide, would be required to provide, is
Page 3 of 5
XXXX 2/17/2025 7:58 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1889
currently providing, or has provided a similar accommodation to other
classes of employees, then a rebuttable presumption is created that the
accommodation does not impose an undue hardship on the employer;[
or]
(d) To require as a condition of employment that any employee or applicant for
employment abstain from smoking or using tobacco products outside the
course of employment, as long as the person complies with any workplace
policy concerning smoking; or
(e) To require as a condition of employment that any employee be immunized
against disease if that employee has:
1. A sincerely held religious belief against immunization; or
2. Received the written opinion of a health care provider that the
required immunization would be injurious to his or her health.
(2) (a) A difference in employee contribution rates for smokers and nonsmokers in
relation to an employer-sponsored health plan shall not be deemed to be an
unlawful practice in violation of this section.
(b) The offering of incentives or benefits offered by an employer to employees
who participate in a smoking cessation program shall not be deemed to be an
unlawful practice in violation of this section.
(3) (a) An employer shall provide written notice of the right to be free from
discrimination in relation to pregnancy, childbirth, and related medical
conditions, including the right to reasonable accommodations, to [:
1. ]new employees at the commencement of employment[; and
2. Existing employees not later than thirty (30) days after June 27, 2019].
(b) An employer shall conspicuously post a written notice of the right to be free
from discrimination in relation to pregnancy, childbirth, and related medical
conditions, including the right to reasonable accommodations, at the
Page 4 of 5
XXXX 2/17/2025 7:58 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1889
employer's place of business in an area accessible to employees.
Page 5 of 5
XXXX 2/17/2025 7:58 AM Jacketed